Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6634YH (3) 91 mb/md H.F. 2632 Section 1. Section 75.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. a. When a proposition to authorize an issuance of 3 bonds by a county, township, school corporation that is not a 4 school district , city, or by any local board or commission, is 5 submitted to the electors, such proposition shall not be deemed 6 carried or adopted, anything in the statutes to the contrary 7 notwithstanding, unless the vote in favor of such authorization 8 is equal to at least sixty percent of the total vote cast for 9 and against said proposition at said election. All elections 10 on such proposition shall be held on the date specified in 11 section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph âdâ . 12 b. When a proposition to authorize an issuance of bonds by a 13 school district is submitted to the electors, such proposition 14 shall not be deemed carried or adopted, anything in the 15 statutes to the contrary notwithstanding, unless the vote in 16 favor of such authorization exceeds fifty percent of the total 17 vote cast for and against said proposition at said election. 18 All elections on such proposition shall be held on the date 19 specified in section 39.2, subsection 4, paragraph âdâ . 20 Sec. 2. Section 296.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 296.6 Bonds. 23 If the vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds is equal 24 to at least sixty percent of the total vote cast for and 25 against said proposition at said election meets the applicable 26 vote requirement under section 75.1 , the board of directors 27 shall issue the same and make provision for payment thereof. 28